South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S362.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 19, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-19-5. For the purposes of this chapter, person who pays a fee to participate in a game, activity, or event in which skill predominates over chance including, but not limited to, a Professional Golf Association (PGA) Tournament; a National Association for Stock Car Auto Racing (NASCAR) event; a billfishing or bass fishing tournament; an Association of Tennis Professional Tour event or Women's Tennis Association Tour event; a turkey shoot; or any non-card-based predominant skill game, activity, or event, and receives a thing of value proportionate to how skillfully he plays in the game, activity, or event is not gambling. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----